Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 1
COLORADO CARES RX ACT

25.5-2.5-101. Short title.

The short title of this part 1 is the "Colorado Cares Rx Act".

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 1, § 1, effective February 5.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-005), ch. 184, p. 2073, § 4, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-005, see section 1 of chapter 184, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-2.5-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

Uninsured, underinsured, and older Coloradans pay a disproportionately greater share of their income for prescription drugs. In many cases, current drug prices have the effect of denying residents access to necessary medical care, thereby threatening their health and safety.

Prescription drugs play an increasingly important role in improving or stabilizing a person's health and in reducing overall health-care costs;

Additionally, the new medicare prescription drug benefit restricts persons from purchasing insurance in order to fully cover their prescription drug needs. This restriction on a person's ability to purchase adequate coverage may threaten the person's health and safety.

Currently, there is no limit on the amount that a pharmacy may charge for a generic or nonpatented drug, and, although some retail pharmacies are offering some generic and nonpatented drugs at discounted prices, there are no guarantees that the pharmacies will continue to do so.

The general assembly, therefore, declares that it is important to make information available to the public concerning ways to purchase lower-cost generic and nonpatented prescription drugs through the "Colorado Cares Rx Act" in order to protect the health of uninsured, underinsured, and older Coloradans. The general assembly further declares that the state should continue to actively research cost-effective mechanisms or programs that may provide additional options to address this need in Colorado.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 1, § 1, effective February 5.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-132), ch. 224, p. 1011, § 1, effective May 4.

25.5-2.5-103. Lower-cost prescription drugs - information - research - reporting.

The state department shall make information available to the public concerning lower-cost prescription drug programs. The information shall include, but need not be limited to:

Ways in which low-income, uninsured persons can obtain lower-cost prescription drugs; and

Contact information concerning programs for lower-cost prescription drugs.

The state department shall research cost-effective programs or mechanisms by which low-income, uninsured persons may purchase lower-cost prescription drugs.

The state department shall report annually to the health and human services committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, concerning the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 2, § 1, effective February 5.

L. 2009:

Entire section R&RE, (SB 09-132), ch. 224, p. 1012, § 2, effective May 4.

25.5-2.5-104. Program - rules - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 2, § 1, effective February 5.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (SB 09-132), ch. 224, p. 1012, § 3, effective May 4.

25.5-2.5-105. Cash fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 4, § 1, effective February 5.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (SB 09-132), ch. 224, p. 1012, § 3, effective May 4.

25.5-2.5-106. Repeal of article. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article added, p. 4, § 1, effective February 5.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (SB 09-132), ch. 224, p. 1012, § 3, effective May 4.